Vermont, session 2025-2026, H700.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds:
(1) cannabis has been legalized for adult use in 24 states and the District
of Columbia;
VT LEG #385201 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.700
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) of the 25 legal jurisdictions, only Vermont, Virginia, Connecticut,
and Massachusetts limit cannabis edible potency to five milligrams of
tetrahydrocannabinol per serving;
(3) of these 25 jurisdictions, only Vermont and Connecticut limit
cannabis flower potency to 30 percent tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabis
concentrate potency to 60 percent tetrahydrocannabinol; and
(4) limits on cannabis product potency deprive cannabis consumers of
choice, drive high-potency consumers to the unregulated illicit market and
neighboring states, and incentivize underreporting potency, as well as the
dilution and underrefinement of concentrates, all of which increases risk to the
health and safety of cannabis consumers.
(b) The purpose of this act is to harmonize Vermont’s cannabis potency
limits with the well-established national consensus among legal states and to
improve consumer safety.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 868 is amended to read:
§ 868. PROHIBITED PRODUCTS
(a) Except as provided in section 907 of this title relating to a retailer with a
medical endorsement, the following are prohibited products and may not be
cultivated, produced, or sold pursuant to a license issued under this chapter:
(1) cannabis flower with greater than 30 percent tetrahydrocannabinol;
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #385201 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.700
2026 Page 3 of 4
(2) flavored oil cannabis products sold prepackaged for use with battery-
powered devices and any cannabis flower that contains characterizing flavor
that is not naturally occurring in the cannabis;
(3) cannabis products that contain delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and
nicotine or alcoholic beverages; and
(4) any cannabis, cannabis products, or packaging of such items that are
designed to make the product more appealing to persons under 21 years of age.
(b)(1) Except as provided by subdivision (2) of this subsection and in
section 907 of this title relating to a retailer with a medical endorsement, solid
and liquid concentrate cannabis products with greater than 60 percent
tetrahydrocannabinol may be produced by a licensee and sold to another
licensee in accordance with subchapter 3 of this chapter but shall not be sold to
the public by a licensed retailer or integrated licensee.
(2) Liquid concentrate cannabis products with greater than 60 percent
tetrahydrocannabinol that are prepackaged for use with battery-powered
devices shall be permitted to be sold to the public by a licensed retailer or
integrated licensee. [Repealed.]
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 881(a)(3) is amended to read:
(3) Rules concerning product manufacturers shall include:
VT LEG #385201 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.700
2026 Page 4 of 4
(A) requirements that a single package of a cannabis product shall
not contain more than 100 milligrams of THC tetrahydrocannabinol, except in
the case of:
(i) cannabis products that are not consumable, including topical
preparations;
(ii) solid concentrates, oils, and tinctures; and
(iii) cannabis products sold to a dispensary pursuant to 18 V.S.A.
chapter 86 and rules adopted pursuant to that chapter;
(B) requirements that cannabis products are labeled in a manner that
states the number of servings of tetrahydrocannabinol in the product, measured
in servings of a maximum of five 10 milligrams per serving, except:
(i) cannabis products that are not consumable, including topical
preparations; and
(ii) cannabis products sold to a dispensary pursuant to 18 V.S.A.
chapter 86 chapter 37 of this title and rules adopted pursuant to that chapter;
and
(iii) cannabis and cannabis products that are intended for
inhalation;
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385201 v.2